Massachusetts, session 194th, S497.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 43A of chapter 54 of the general laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “congressman” the following word:- governor’s.
SECTION 2. Section 150 of said chapter 54 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “each,” in line 4, the following word:- governor’s.
SECTION 3. Said section 150 of said chapter 54 is hereby further amended by inserting
after the word “one,” in line 5, the word:- governor’s.
of 1